Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-503.1j, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2-503.1j. A. Any licensee of a money transmission,


transmitter, or wire transmitter business pursuant to the Oklahoma


Financial Transaction Reporting Act and their delegates shall


collect a fee of Five Dollars ($5.00) Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00)


for each transaction not in excess of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00)


and in addition to such fee an amount equal to one percent (1%) five


percent (5%) of the amount in excess of Five Hundred Dollars


($500.00).


B. The fee prescribed by subsection A of this section shall be


remitted quarterly to the Oklahoma Tax Commission on such forms as

Req. No. 2533 Page 1


the Tax Commission, with the assistance of the Oklahoma State Bureau


of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control, may prescribe for such


purpose. All required forms and remittances shall be filed with the


Tax Commission not later than the fifteenth day of the month


following the close of each calendar quarter.


C. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall apportion all revenues


derived from the fee to the Drug Money Laundering and Wire


Transmitter Revolving Fund.


D. Every licensee and their delegates shall post a notice on a


form prescribed by the Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control that notifies customers that


upon filing an individual income tax return with either a valid


social security number or a valid taxpayer identification number the


customer shall be entitled to an income tax credit equal to the


amount of the fee paid by the customer for the transaction.


E. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall be afforded all provisions


currently under law to enforce the provisions of subsection B of


this section. If a licensee fails to file reports or fails to remit


the fee authorized by subsection B A of this section, the Oklahoma


Tax Commission shall have the authority pursuant to Section 212 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes to suspend the license of the


licensee and its delegates. A notification of the suspension shall


also be sent to the State Banking Commissioner and the Director of


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control.

Req. No. 2533 Page 2


The licensee and its delegates may not reapply for a license until


all required reports have been filed and all required fee amounts


have been remitted.


F. Upon request from the Oklahoma Tax Commission, the State


Banking Commissioner may make a claim against the surety bond of the


licensee on behalf of the State of Oklahoma this state.


G. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs


Control and its attorneys may assist the Oklahoma Tax Commission in


conducting audits and the prosecution and/or or seeking of legal


remedies to ensure compliance with this act the Drug Money


Laundering and Wire Transmitter Act.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2533 TEK 1/15/2026 11:52:09 AM













Req. No. 2533 Page 3